Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5523DP (4) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 GAMBLING 2 Section 1. Section 99D.5, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. Commission members are each entitled to receive an 5 annual salary of ten thousand dollars. Members shall also be 6 reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance 7 of their duties to a maximum of thirty thousand dollars per 8 year for the commission . Each member shall be covered by the 9 blanket surety bond of the state purchased pursuant to section 10 8A.321, subsection 12 . 11 Sec. 2. Section 99D.7, subsection 25, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 25. To take any other action as may be reasonable or 14 appropriate to enforce this chapter and the commission rules , 15 including but not limited to issuing cease and desist orders 16 and obtaining injunctive relief against a person offering 17 pari-mutuel wagering or advance deposit wagering, as defined in 18 section 99D.11, in this state without holding an appropriate 19 license issued by the commission . 20 Sec. 3. Section 99E.3, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code 2026, 21 is amended to read as follows: 22 f. To take any other action as may be reasonable or 23 appropriate to enforce this chapter and the commission rules , 24 including but not limited to issuing cease and desist orders 25 and obtaining injunctive relief against a person offering 26 internet fantasy sports contests in this state without holding 27 an appropriate license issued by the commission . 28 Sec. 4. Section 99F.4, subsection 13, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 13. To take any other action as may be reasonable or 31 appropriate to enforce this chapter and the commission rules , 32 including but not limited to issuing cease and desist orders 33 and obtaining injunctive relief against a person offering games 34 of chance, gambling, sports wagering, or illegal sweepstakes in 35 -1- LSB 5523DP (4) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ this state without holding an appropriate license issued by the 1 commission or otherwise being specifically authorized by law . 2 Sec. 5. Section 99F.15, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 A person commits a class âDâ felony and, in addition, shall 5 be barred for life from sports wagering, advance deposit sports 6 wagering, as defined in section 99F.9, excursion gambling 7 boats , and gambling structures under the jurisdiction of the 8 commission, if the person does any of the following: 9 Sec. 6. Section 99F.15, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 c. Two convictions of the offense of unlawful betting as 12 provided in this subsection shall result in the person being 13 barred for life from sports wagering, advance deposit sports 14 wagering, as defined in section 99F.9, excursion gambling 15 boats , and gambling structures under the jurisdiction of the 16 commission. 17 DIVISION II 18 STATE BUILDING CODE 19 Sec. 7. Section 103A.8C, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 20 to read as follows: 21 1. The commissioner, after consulting with and receiving 22 recommendations from the department of public defense homeland 23 security and emergency management and the department of natural 24 resources, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A specifying 25 standards and requirements for design and construction of safe 26 rooms and storm shelters. In developing these standards, the 27 commissioner shall consider nationally recognized standards. 28 The standards and requirements shall be incorporated into the 29 state building code established in section 103A.7 , but shall 30 not be interpreted to require the inclusion of a safe room or 31 storm shelter in a building construction project unless such 32 inclusion is expressly required by another statute or by a 33 federal statute or regulation. However, if a safe room or 34 storm shelter is included in any building construction project 35 -2- LSB 5523DP (4) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ which reaches the design development phase on or after January 1 1, 2011, compliance with the standards developed pursuant to 2 this section shall be required. 3 Sec. 8. Section 103A.23, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 2. All fees collected by the commissioner shall be deposited 6 in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund of the 7 state licensing and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . 8 DIVISION III 9 RESIDENTIAL CARE FACILITIES 10 Sec. 9. Section 135C.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph 11 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 The department shall establish a special classification 13 within the residential care facility category for residential 14 care facilities which have the primary purpose of serving 15 pediatric palliative care patients and that only provides 16 respite care services and the services of a hospice program 17 as defined in section 135J.1 . A facility within the special 18 classification established pursuant to this subsection shall 19 be exempt from section 135.62 and may serve any number of 20 individuals, including zero . The department shall adopt rules 21 pursuant to chapter 17A which shall include but not be limited 22 to all of the following: 23